Utah statutes.
70A-2-703.   Seller's remedies in general.

Where the buyer wrongfully rejects or revokes acceptance of goods or fails to make a payment due on or before delivery or repudiates with respect to a part or the whole, then with respect to any goods directly affected and, if the breach is of the whole contract (Section 70A-2-612), then also with respect to the whole undelivered balance, the aggrieved seller may

(a)  withhold delivery of such goods;

(b)  stop delivery by any bailee as hereafter provided (Section 70A-2-705);

(c)  proceed under the next section respecting goods still unidentified to the contract;

(d)  resell and recover damages as hereafter provided (Section 70A-2-706);

(e)  recover damages for nonacceptance (Section 70A-2-708) or in a proper case the price (Section 70A-2-709);

(f)  cancel.



Enacted by Chapter 154, 1965 General Session

